New York, session 2025-2026, S8222.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2826 of the public health law is amended by adding 2 a new subdivision (h) to read as follows: 3 (h) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the commis- 4 sioner is authorized to grant approval to eligible programs established 5 by not-for-profit and public skilled nursing facilities in any of the 6 five nursing home regions in upstate New York, which are designed to 7 work collaboratively on efforts to improve nursing home efficiency, 8 staffing, and quality of care. Upon application by the regional program, 9 the commissioner shall approve those regions which apply for such desig- 10 nation who can demonstrate, to the satisfaction of the commissioner, 11 that the programs present a collaborative effort designed to improve the 12 quality of nursing home care and services and that appropriate program 13 structural safeguards are included to prevent any collusion or anti-com- 14 petitive practices. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13192-01-5